Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202186-1308
Grants; funding; limitation; maximum amount; applicant; agree to provide service.

(1) For each fiscal year, the commission shall approve grant funding for all qualified applicants within the limits of available appropriations.

(2) As a condition of accepting a grant under the program, the applicant shall agree to provide broadband Internet service in the project area until released from the applicant's commitment by the commission.

(3) The commission shall not add to the obligations required of a grant recipient after the grant is awarded without the consent of the grant recipient.

(4) The maximum grant amount awarded under the program with respect to any single project shall be five million dollars.

Laws 2021, LB388, § 8.